orig/pronounLexcErz.lexc
!Q!LEXICON Pers_Pronouns
!Q!< м о н:0 %+Pers:0 %+Pron:0 %+1Sg:0 "@P.PossPx.1Sg@" "@P.NUM.SG@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!Q!< т о н:0 %+Pers:0 %+Pron:0 %+2Sg:0 "@P.PossPx.2Sg@" "@P.NUM.SG@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!Q!< с о н:0 %+Pers:0 %+Pron:0 %+3Sg:0 "@P.PossPx.3Sg@" "@P.NUM.SG@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!Q!< м и н:0 ь:0 %+Pers:0 %+Pron:0 %+1Pl:0 "@P.PossPx.1Pl@" "@P.NUM.PL@"> Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!Q!< т ы н:0 ь:0 %+Pers:0 %+Pron:0 %+2Pl:0 "@P.PossPx.2Pl@" "@P.NUM.PL@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!Q!< с ы н:0 ь:0 %+Pers:0 %+Pron:0 %+3Pl:0 "@P.PossPx.3Pl@" "@P.NUM.PL@" > Pers_Pronouns1 ;
!Q!эсь+Pron+Refl:эсе Pers_Pronouns1_es ;
!Q!эсь+Pron+Refl:эсь # ;
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON Pers_Pronouns1
!Q! Pers_Pronouns1_es ;
!Q!+Nom:нУ4 Tenses1 ;
!Q!+Det+Nom:нсь Tenses1 ;
!Q!+Det+Gen:нсе PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Det+Gen:нсе CXPossPX1 ;
!Q!+Det+Abe:нстеме PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Det+Abl:нстеде PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Det+Comp:нсешка PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Det+Dat:нсте PossPX1 ;
!Q!
!Q!< 0:н 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Dial:0 %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:з 0:о %+Dial:0 %+Gen:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!+Abe:нтеме  PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Abl:нде  PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Comp:ньшка PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Dat:не  PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Ela:ньстэ  PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Ill:ньзэ  PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Ine:ньсэ  PossPX1 ;
!Q!+Prol:ньга PossPX1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:ь 0:к 0:с %+Transl:0 "@P.LV.ON@" > PossPX ;
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON Pers_Pronouns1_es
!Q!< 0:н 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:т 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.PossPx@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:з 0:э %+Gen:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:е 0:к %+Gen:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:к %+Gen:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:с 0:т %+Gen:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:с 0:т %+Dial:0 %+Gen:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@" > Tenses1 ;
!Q!!Derivation for Determinates
!Q!< 0:н 0:е %+Gen:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Determinates1 ; 
!Q!< 0:н 0:е %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:т 0:ь %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.PossPx@"> Determinates ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:з 0:э %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:е 0:к %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@" > Determinates ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:к %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@" > Determinates ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:с 0:т %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@ "> Determinates ;
!Q!
!Q!< 0:н 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> Determinates1 ; 
!Q!< 0:н 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:т 0:с 0:е  %+Gen:0 %+2Sg:0 "@D.PossPx@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:з 0:э 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:е 0:к 0:с 0:е  %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:к 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:с 0:т 0:с 0:е %+Gen:0 %+PossPX %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON CXPossPX1
!Q! CXPossPX1_A ;
!Q!< %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!Q!< %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON CXPossPX1_A
!Q!< 0:н 0:з 0:э %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:е 0:к %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:к %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!Q!< 0:с 0:т %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!Q!< 0:н 0:с 0:т %+Dial:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@"> CXPossPX1-CX ;
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON CXPossPX1-CX 
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:V1 %+LV:0 "@P.LV.ON@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!Q!< "@P.LV.OFF@"> CXPossPX1-CX_1 ;
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON CXPossPX1-CX_1
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:мО1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abe %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abl %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Comp %+Det:0 %+Sg:0  >  Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Dat %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@R.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Gen %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@R.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ela:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ine:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:ь %+Nom:0 %+Sg:0 %+Det:0 "@P.NUM.SG@">  Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Prol:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Transl:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@R.LV.ON@" > Clitics  ;
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:м 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abe:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abl:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Comp:0  >  Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Pl:0 %+Det:0  %+Dat:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:ь  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Gen:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ela:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ill:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:э %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ine:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Nom:0 "@D.LV.ON@" "@P.NUM.PL@">  Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Prol:0  "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:к 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Transl:0 "@D.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON PossPX
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:V1 %+LV:0 %+PossPX:0 "@R.LV.ON@"> PossPX1 ;
!Q!< %+PossPX:0 "@D.LV.ON@"> PossPX1 ;
!Q!+NoPossPX: Clitics ;
!Q!
LEXICON PossPX1
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:У4 %+Poss:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:м  %+Dial:0 %+Poss:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.1Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:т 0:У4 %+Poss:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Dial:0 %+Poss:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.2Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:з 0:О1 %+Poss:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:з 0:о %+Dial:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.PossPx.3Sg@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:О1 0:к %+Poss:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.1Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:к %+Poss:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.2Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;
< 0:%^ 0:н 0:с 0:т %+Dial:0 %+Poss:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.PossPx.3Pl@">  SecondaryDeclination ;

!Q!LEXICON Determinates
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:V1 %+LV:0 %+PossPX:0 "@P.LV.ON@"> Determinates1;
!Q!< %+PossPX:0 "@P.LV.OFF@"> Determinates1 ;
!Q!
!Q!LEXICON Determinates1
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:ь %+Nom:0 %+Sg:0 %+Det:0 "@U.LV.ON@" "@P.NUM.SG@">  Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:мО1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abe %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Abl %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Comp %+Det:0 %+Sg:0  >  Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Dat %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Gen %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.ON@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ela:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Ine:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а 0:%^ 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Prol:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:к 0:с 0:э 0:н 0:т 0:ь %+Transl:0 %+Det:0 %+Sg:0 "@U.LV.ON@" > Clitics  ;
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:в 0:т 0:О1 0:м 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abe:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:д 0:О1 %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Abl:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:ш 0:к 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Comp:0  >  Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:е 0:н 0:ь %+Pl:0 %+Det:0  %+Dat:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:н 0:ь  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Gen:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:т 0:э  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ela:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ill:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:с 0:э %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Ine:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Nom:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" "@P.NUM.PL@">  Tenses1 ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:Г2 0:а %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Prol:0  "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;
!Q!< 0:%^ 0:т 0:н 0:е 0:%^ 0:к 0:с  %+Pl:0 %+Det:0 %+Transl:0 "@U.LV.OFF@" > Clitics ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!
LEXICON Tenses1_Prep-SG
<"@P.NUM.SG@"> Tenses1 ;

LEXICON Tenses1
+NoPredx: Clitics ;
+LV:^V1  Tenses1_A_ReqVow ; !This provides linking vowel
+NoLV:^ Tenses1_A  ; !This denies linking vowel
!!2009-09-23!+Pres+Pred+3Sg:0 Clitics ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A
<"@D.LV.ON@"> Tenses1_A_NoReqVow ;
<"@C.LV@"> Tenses1_A_ReqVow ;

LEXICON Tenses1_A_NoReqVow
+Pres+Pred+1Sg:А2н Clitics ;
+Pres+Pred+2Sg:А2т Clitics ;
!+Pres+Pred+3Sg: Clitics ;
+Pres+Pred+1Pl:тА2но Clitics ;
+Pres+Pred+2Pl:тА2до Clitics ;
+Pres+Pred+3Pl:тУ4 Clitics ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A_ReqVow
+PretII+Pred+1Sg:линь Clitics ;
+PretII+Pred+2Sg:лить Clitics ;
+PretII+Pred+3Sg:ль Clitics ;
+PretII+Pred+1Pl:линек Clitics ;
+PretII+Pred+2Pl:лиде Clitics ;
+PretII+Pred+3Pl:льть Clitics ;




!!!!!
!!

LEXICON Clitics
+CliticButi:^-бути # ;
+CliticGak:^Г1ак  # ;
 # ;

END

@C.PossPx@
@C.LV@

@C.NUM@

@C.PERS@

@C.INDET@
